Utah statutes.
53A-1a-703.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Assessment team" means a team consisting of:

(a)  the student's parent or guardian;

(b)  the student's private school classroom teacher;

(c)  special education personnel from the student's school district; and

(d)  if available, special education personnel from the private school at which the student is enrolled.

(2)  "Board" means the State Board of Education.

(3)  "Eligible private school" means a private school that meets the requirements of Section 53A-1a-705.

(4)  "IEP" means a written statement for a student with a disability that is developed, reviewed, and revised in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.

(5)  "Scholarship student" means a student who receives a scholarship under this part.

(6)  "Value of the weighted pupil unit" means the amount established each year in statute that is multiplied by the number of weighted pupil units to yield the funding level for the basic state-supported school program.

